Utah statutes.
48-2c-705.   Voting.

(1)  Subject to the provisions of Section 48-2c-803, the articles of organization or operating agreement may grant to all or a specified class or group of members the right to consent, vote, or agree, on a percentage interest basis or a per capita basis or other basis, upon any matter.

(2)  Any member may vote in person or by proxy.

